Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Article 3. Animals Running at Large

§ 3451.
Cattle, horses, or swine.

If a person suffers his or her neat cattle, horses, or swine to run at large on the highways or commons, any person may impound them.
The owner shall pay the charges of the impounder and poundkeeper, and the poundkeeper shall not release such animals until the charges are paid.

§ 3452.
Notice.

When such animals are impounded, the poundkeeper shall, within 24 hours, post a notice in a public place in the town, describing the animals and stating the time and place of impounding and the time and place of sale.

§ 3453.
Sale.

If the owner of the animals, within 20 days, pays the poundkeeper his or her fees, including his or her reasonable expenses for advertising and the reasonable expense of keeping, with the impounder’s fees, the animals shall be released, otherwise they shall be sold by the poundkeeper at public auction, and the avails shall be applied as in case of the sale of animals taken doing damage when the owner is unknown.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 262

, § 34, eff. June 11, 1959.

§ 3454.
Stallions.

A stallion found running at large may be impounded. Within 48 hours, the impounder shall notify the owner or keeper thereof. If the owner or keeper does not, within three days after such notice, pay to the impounder such damages as are assessed by three disinterested freeholders, appointed by a justice of the peace or a Superior judge of the county, with the costs and expenses of impounding, appraising, and the poundkeeper’s charge of $50.00 per day, the impounder may sell the stallion at public auction to satisfy the same, giving four days’ notice of the time and place of sale, and the balance, after paying the damage and expenses, shall be paid to the treasurer of the town in which the stallion was impounded, for the use of the owner, if demanded within one year, otherwise to the use of the town.

HISTORY:

Amended

1965, No. 194

, § 10, eff. Feb. 1, 1967;

1997, No. 16

, § 3.